District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1021

Application for exemption and hearing procedure.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 24
as added Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-208, § 2, 37 DCR 8458
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1022.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3421.

Editor's Notes

For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.